Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,139
Violations; prosecution; duty of Attorney General and county attorney.

Upon the request of the department, the Attorney General shall institute in the name of the state the proper civil or criminal proceedings against any person regarding whom a complaint has been made, charging him or her with violation of any of the provisions of the Uniform Credentialing Act, and the county attorney, at the request of the Attorney General or of the department, shall appear and prosecute such action when brought in his or her county.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 70, p. 472;

C.S.1929, § 71-904;

R.S.1943, § 71-171;

Laws 1991, LB 456, § 24;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-171;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 139.